Massachusetts, session 194th, S803.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 30 the following section:
Section 31. (a) Any coverage offered by the commission to any active or retired
employee of the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide
coverage for the provision of an annual executive physical examination.
(b) Reimbursement provided under subsection (a) of this section for an annual executive
physical examination in an inpatient setting shall be provided separately from the existing
hospital payment for inpatient services.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 10N the following section:
of 4

Section 10O. (a) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall
provide coverage for the provision of an annual executive physical examination.
(b) Reimbursement provided under subsection (a) of this section for an annual executive
physical examination in an inpatient setting shall be provided separately from the existing
hospital payment for inpatient services.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 47PP the following:
Section 47QQ. (a) An individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued
pursuant to section 108 and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section 110 shall provide
benefits for residents of the Commonwealth and all group members having a principal place of
employment within the Commonwealth coverage for the provision of an annual executive
physical examination.
(b) Reimbursement provided under subsection (a) of this section for an annual executive
physical examination in an inpatient setting shall be provided separately from the existing
hospital payment for inpatient services.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 8QQ the following:
Section 8RR. (a) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without
of 4

the Commonwealth shall provide to all individual subscribers and members within the
Commonwealth and to all group members having a principal place of employment within the
Commonwealth coverage for the provision an annual physical examination.
(b) Reimbursement provided under subsection (a) of this section for an annual executive
physical examination in an inpatient setting shall be provided separately from the existing
hospital payment for inpatient services.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4QQ the following:
Section 4RR. (a) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical
service agreement that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without the Commonwealth
shall provide to all individual subscribers and members within the Commonwealth and to all
group members having a principal place of employment within the Commonwealth coverage for
the provision of an annual executive physical examination.
(b) Reimbursement provided under subsection (a) of this section for an annual executive
physical examination in an inpatient setting shall be provided separately from the existing
hospital payment for inpatient services.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4GG the following:
Section 4HH: (a) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued,
renewed or delivered within or without the Commonwealth shall provide to residents of the
of 4

Commonwealth and to persons having a principal place of employment within the
Commonwealth coverage for the provision of an annual executive physical examination.
(b) Reimbursement provided under subsection (a) of this section for an annual executive
physical examination in an inpatient setting shall be provided separately from the existing
hospital payment for inpatient services.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 through 6 of this act shall apply to all policies, contracts and
certificates of health insurance subject to chapters 32A, chapter 118E, chapter 175, chapter
176A, chapter 176B, and chapter 176G which are delivered, issued or renewed on or after
September 1, 2026.
of 4